Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; AMENDING CAPACITY LIMITS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families must amend Minnesota Rules, part 9502.0365, subpart 1, item A, to exclude up to two of the caregiver's own children for the purposes of the licensed capacity. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other requirements for good cause exempt rulemaking, the commissioner may use the process under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section, 14.388. new text end